Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska22-219
Territory; transfer to another county; election; notice.

Notices of such election shall contain a description of the territory proposed to be transferred, the names of the counties from and to which such transfer is intended to be made, and shall be posted with the other notices for general elections.

Laws 1879, § 5, p. 354;

R.S.1913, § 930;

C.S.1922, § 836;

C.S.1929, § 25-219;

R.S.1943, § 22-219.